Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 8. Adjudication.

§ 16.1-273.
Court may require investigation of social history and preparation of victim impact statement.

When a juvenile and domestic relations district court or circuit court has adjudicated any case involving a child subject to the jurisdiction of the court hereunder, except for a traffic violation, a violation of the game and fish law, or a violation of any city ordinance regulating surfing or establishing curfew violations, the court before final disposition thereof may require an investigation, which (i) shall include a drug screening and (ii) may, and for the purposes of subdivision A 14 or 17 of §

16.1-278.8

shall, include a social history of the physical, mental, and social conditions, including an assessment of any affiliation with a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

, and personality of the child and the facts and circumstances surrounding the violation of law. However, in the case of a juvenile adjudicated delinquent on the basis of an act committed on or after January 1, 2000, which would be (a) a felony if committed by an adult, or (b) a violation under Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) or Article 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 and such offense would be punishable as a Class 1 or Class 2 misdemeanor if committed by an adult, the court shall order the juvenile to undergo a drug screening. If the drug screening indicates that the juvenile has a substance abuse or dependence problem, an assessment shall be completed by a certified substance abuse counselor as defined in §

54.1-3500

employed by the Department of Juvenile Justice or by a locally operated court services unit or by an individual employed by or currently under contract to such agencies and who is specifically trained to conduct such assessments under the supervision of such counselor.

The court also shall, on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth with the consent of the victim, or may in its discretion, require the preparation of a victim impact statement in accordance with the provisions of §

19.2-299.1

if the court determines that the victim may have suffered significant physical, psychological, or economic injury as a result of the violation of law.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-164; 1956, c. 555; 1972, cc. 672, 835; 1973, c. 440; 1977, cc. 559, 627; 1993, c. 603; 1998, cc. 783, 840; 1999, cc. 350, 891, 913; 2000, cc. 1020, 1041; 2005, c. 843; 2007, c. 510; 2014, cc. 20, 249; 2020, cc. 1285, 1286; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Cross references.

For disposition of court-ordered studies and reports, see Rule 8:5, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 1999, cc. 891 and 913, cl. 2, provide: “That the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may designate pilot sites to implement the provisions of this act prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1999]. The Interagency Drug Offender Screening and Assessment Committee established pursuant to § 2.1-51.18:3 shall make recommendations to the Chief Justice regarding pilot sites.”

Acts 2000, cc. 1020 and 1041, cl. 2 provide: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $.

Acts 2000, cc. 1020 and 1041, cl. 3 provide: “That the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission shall review the minimum discretionary felony sentencing guideline midpoint and the sentencing recommendation for convictions related to possessing, manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing, or possessing with intent to distribute a Schedule I or II drug or marijuana when the defendant has previously been convicted of such an offense. The Commission’s review shall include an examination of whether the minimum midpoint and the sentencing recommendation are adequate in deterring recidivism and insuring that substance abuse screening and assessment and criminal justice sanctions are integrated with substance abuse treatment services available through the Department of Corrections and local corrections agencies and facilities. The Commission’s review shall be completed in time to make recommendations to the General Assembly on or before December 1, 2000.”

Acts 2014, cc. 20 and 249, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2014.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, s amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 421 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16.1-273

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Juvenile Justice, including locally-operated court services units, shall not be required to provide drug screening and assessment services in conjunction with investigations ordered by the courts.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 783 and 840, effective July 1, 1999, are identical, and in subsection A, added clause (i), added the clause (ii) designation, and added the present last sentence.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 350 inserted “including an assessment of any affiliation with a youth gang as defined in §

16.1-299.2

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 891 and 913 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “and assessment by a certified substance abuse counselor as defined in §

54.1-3500

employed by the Department of Juvenile Justice” following “drug screening” in clause (i), substituted “January 1, 2000, which would be a felony if committed by an adult, or a violation under Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) or Article 1.1 (§

18.2-265.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 and such offense would be punishable as a Class 1 or Class 2 misdemeanor if committed by an adult, the court shall order the juvenile to undergo a drug screening” for “July 1, 1999, which would be a Class 1 or 2 misdemeanor or a felony if committed by an adult, the court shall require an investigation, which shall include a drug screening and assessment by a certified substance abuse counselor as defined in §

54.1-3500

employed by the Department of Juvenile Justice,” and added the last sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1020 and 1041 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “individual employed by or currently under contract to such agencies and who is specifically trained to conduct such assessments under the” for “agency employee under the direct,” and deleted “a” preceding “counselor” near the end of the subsection.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 843, in subsection A, substituted “criminal street” for “youth” and “18.2-46.1” for “16.1-299.2.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 510 inserted “and for the purposes of §

16.1-278.7

shall” near the beginning of clause (ii) in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 20 and 249, effective October 1, 2014, are identical, and in subsection A, clause (ii), substituted “subdivision A 14 or A 17 of §

16.1-278.8

” for “§ 16.1-78.7” and inserted “a social history of” following “shall, include”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1285 and 1286 are identical, and in the second sentence, inserted “(a),” “(b)” and “or (c) a violation of §

18.2-250.1

” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “or (c) a violation of §

18.2-250.1

” preceding “the court shall order” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-278. Order for Investigation and Report.

§ 16.1-274.
Time for filing of reports; copies furnished to attorneys; amended reports; fees.

Whenever any court directs an investigation pursuant to subdivision A of §

16.1-237

or §

16.1-273

or

9.1-153

, or an evaluation pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

, the probation officer, court-appointed special advocate, or other agency conducting such investigation shall file such report with the clerk of the court directing the investigation. The clerk shall furnish a copy of such report to all attorneys representing parties in the matter before the court no later than 72 hours, and in cases of child custody, 15 days, prior to the time set by the court for hearing the matter. If such probation officer or other agency discovers additional information or a change in circumstance after the filing of the report, an amended report shall be filed forthwith and a copy sent to each person who received a copy of the original report. Whenever such a report is not filed or an amended report is filed, the court shall grant such continuance of the proceedings as justice requires. All attorneys receiving such report or amended report shall return such to the clerk upon the conclusion of the hearing and shall not make copies of such report or amended report or any portion thereof. However, the chief judge of each juvenile and domestic relations district court may provide for an alternative means of copying and distributing reports or amended reports referenced above.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

16.1-69.48:2

and

17.1-275

, when the court directs the appropriate local department of social services to conduct supervised visitation or directs the appropriate local department of social services or court services unit to conduct an investigation pursuant to §

16.1-273

or to provide mediation services in matters involving a child’s custody, visitation, or support, the court shall assess a fee against the petitioner, the respondent, or both, in accordance with fee schedules established by the appropriate local board of social services when the service is provided by a local department of social services or by a court services unit. The fee schedules shall include (i) standards for determining the paying party’s or parties’ ability to pay and (ii) a scale of fees based on the paying party’s or parties’ income and family size and the actual cost of the services provided. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual cost of the service. The fee shall be assessed as a cost of the case and shall be paid as prescribed by the court to the local department of social services, locally operated court services unit or Department of Juvenile Justice, whichever performed the service, unless payment is waived. The method and medium for payment for such services shall be determined by the local department of social services, Department of Juvenile Justice, or the locally operated court services unit that provided the services.

When a local department of social services or any court services unit is requested by another local department or court services unit in the Commonwealth or by a similar department or entity in another state to conduct an investigation involving a child’s custody, visitation or support pursuant to §

16.1-273

or, in the case of a request from another state pursuant to a provision corresponding to §

16.1-273

, or to provide mediation services, or for a local department of social services to provide supervised visitation, the local department or the court services unit performing the service may require payment of fees prior to conducting the investigation or providing mediation services or supervised visitation.

In any matter in which the court appoints a guardian ad litem to represent a child, such guardian ad litem shall conduct an investigation in accordance with the Standards to Govern the Performance of Guardians Ad Litem for Children established by the Judicial Council of Virginia. Prior to the commencement of the dispositional hearing of any such matter, the guardian ad litem shall file with the court, with a copy to all attorneys representing parties to such matter and all parties proceeding pro se in such matter, a certification of the guardian ad litem’s compliance with the Standards to Govern the Performance of Guardians Ad Litem for Children established by the Judicial Council of Virginia, specifically addressing compliance with such standards requiring face-to-face contact with the child in such certification. The guardian ad litem shall document the hours spent satisfying such face-to-face contact requirements in such certification, which shall be compensated at the same rate as that for in-court service.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-208.1; 1972, c. 111; 1975, c. 286; 1977, c. 559; 1983, c. 174; 1987, c. 5; 1989, c. 725; 1990, c. 752; 1991, cc. 534, 618; 1992, c. 554; 1993, c. 975; 2001, c. 364; 2006, c. 675; 2012, cc. 164, 456; 2020, c. 21; 2022, c. 543.

Cross references.

For disposition of court-ordered studies and reports, see Rule 8:5, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

For provision authorizing local boards to establish regulations and fee schedules and receive fees for services that a court directs a local department to perform pursuant to this section, see §

63.2-314

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 364, in subsection A, substituted “subsection A of §

16.1-237

, §

16.1-273

” for “§§

16.1-237

A,

16.1-273

,” and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 675 substituted “15 days” for “five days” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 164 and 456 are identical, and substituted “pursuant to subdivision A of §

16.1-237

or §

16.1-273

or

9.1-153

, or” for “pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-237

, §

16.1-273

, or §

9.1-153

, or” in the first sentence of subsection A; substituted “social services or by a court services unit” for “social services and by the State Board of Juvenile Justice when the service is provided by a court services unit” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B; and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 21 added subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 543, substituted “reports referenced above” for “reports filed pursuant to §

9.1-153

” in the last sentence of subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-274.1.
Admission of evidence of juvenile’s age.

In any proceeding in a district court or circuit court where a juvenile is alleged to have committed a delinquent act, the Commonwealth shall be permitted to introduce evidence establishing the age of the juvenile at any time prior to adjudication of the case.

History.

1994, c. 913; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and deleted “delinquency”
preceding “proceeding,” inserted “in a district court or circuit court where a juvenile is alleged to have committed a delinquent act” preceding “the Commonwealth,” and deleted “who is the subject of the delinquency petition” following “the juvenile.”

§ 16.1-274.2.
Certain education records as evidence.

In any proceeding where (i) a juvenile is alleged to have committed a delinquent act that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult and whether such act was committed intentionally or willfully by the juvenile is an element of the delinquent act and (ii) such act was committed (a) during school hours, and during school-related or school-sponsored activities upon the property of a public or private elementary or secondary school or child day center; (b) on any school bus as defined in §

46.2-100

; or (c) upon any property, public or private, during hours when such property is solely being used by a public or private elementary or secondary school for a school-related or school-sponsored activity, the juvenile shall be permitted to introduce into evidence as relevant to whether he acted intentionally or willfully any document created prior to the commission of the alleged delinquent act that relates to (a) an Individualized Education Program developed pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.; (b) a Section 504 Plan prepared pursuant to § 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794; (c) a behavioral intervention plan as defined in 8VAC20-81-10; or (d) a functional behavioral assessment as defined in 8VAC20-81-10.Any such document shall be admitted as evidence of the facts stated therein.

At least 10 days prior to the commencement of the proceeding in which a document listed in subsection A will be offered as evidence, the juvenile intending to offer the document shall notify the attorney for the Commonwealth, in writing, of the intent to offer the document and shall provide or make available copies of the document to be introduced.

Copies of documents listed in subsection A shall be received as evidence, provided that such copies are authenticated to be true and accurate copies by the custodian thereof, or by the person to whom the custodian reports if they are different. An affidavit signed by the custodian of such documents, or by the person to whom the custodian reports if they are different, stating that such documents are true and accurate copies of such documents shall be valid authentication for the purposes of this section.

Upon motion of the juvenile, any document admitted pursuant to this section shall be placed under seal by the court.

History.

2016, c. 726.

§ 16.1-275.
Physical and mental examinations and treatment; nursing and medical care.

The juvenile court or the circuit court may cause any juvenile within its jurisdiction under the provisions of this law to be physically examined and treated by a physician or to be examined and treated at a local mental health center. If no such appropriate facility is available locally, the court may order the juvenile to be examined and treated by any physician or psychiatrist or examined by a clinical psychologist. The Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall provide for distribution a list of appropriate mental health centers available throughout the Commonwealth. Upon the written recommendation of the person examining the juvenile that an adequate evaluation of the juvenile’s treatment needs can only be performed in an inpatient hospital setting, the court shall have the power to send any such juvenile to a state mental hospital for not more than 10 days for the purpose of obtaining a recommendation for the treatment of the juvenile. No juvenile sent to a state mental hospital pursuant to this provision shall be held or cared for in any maximum security unit where adults determined to be criminally insane reside; the juvenile shall be kept separate and apart from such adults. However, the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services may place a juvenile who has been certified to the circuit court for trial as an adult pursuant to §

16.1-269.6

or

16.1-270

or who has been convicted as an adult of a felony in the circuit court in a unit appropriate for the care and treatment of persons under a criminal charge when, in his discretion, such placement is necessary to protect the security or safety of other patients, staff or the public.

Whenever the parent or other person responsible for the care and support of a juvenile is determined by the court to be financially unable to pay the costs of such examination as ordered by the juvenile court or the circuit court, such costs may be paid according to procedures and rates adopted by the Department from funds appropriated in the general appropriation act for the Department.

The juvenile court or the circuit court may cause any juvenile within its jurisdiction who is found to be delinquent for an offense that is eligible for commitment pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or §

16.1-285.1

to be placed in the temporary custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice for a period of time not to exceed 30 days for diagnostic assessment services after the adjudicatory hearing and prior to final disposition of his or her case. Prior to such a placement, the Department shall determine that the personnel, services and space are available in the appropriate correctional facility for the care, supervision and study of such juvenile and that the juvenile’s case is appropriate for referral for diagnostic services.

Whenever a juvenile concerning whom a petition has been filed appears to be in need of nursing, medical or surgical care, the juvenile court or the circuit court may order the parent or other person responsible for the care and support of the juvenile to provide such care in a hospital or otherwise and to pay the expenses thereof. If the parent or other person is unable or fails to provide such care, the juvenile court or the circuit court may refer the matter to the authority designated in accordance with law for the determination of eligibility for such services in the county or city in which such juvenile or his parents have residence or legal domicile.

In any such case, if a parent who is able to do so fails or refuses to comply with the order, the juvenile court or the circuit court may proceed against him as for contempt or may proceed against him for nonsupport.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-190; 1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 354; 1975, c. 430; 1976, c. 321; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 739; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1984, c. 44; 1988, cc. 47, 826; 1990, c. 975; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 2004, c. 321; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 164, 456.

Cross references.

For disposition of court-ordered studies and reports, see Rule 8:5, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 321 substituted “10” for “ten” in the third sentence of subsection A; and substituted “who is found to be delinquent for an offense that is eligible for commitment pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or §

16.1-285.1

to” for “who is alleged to be delinquent or in need of services to” and “30” for “thirty” in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the third and sixth sentences of the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 164 and 456 are nearly identical, and substituted “according to procedures and rates adopted by the Department from funds” for “according to standards, procedures and rates adopted by the State Board, from funds” near the end of the second paragraph. Chapter 164 also inserted “§” preceding “16.1-285.1” in the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For article discussing the involuntary commitment of minors in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 695 (1979).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane & Other Incompetent Persons, §§ 4, 43.

§ 16.1-276.
Fees and travel expenses of witnesses.

The judge may authorize the payment of the fees and mileage provided by law in §

19.2-278

of any witness or person summoned or otherwise required to appear at the hearing of any case coming within the jurisdiction of the court, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated in the general appropriations act to the Supreme Court of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-171; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1982, c. 636.

§ 16.1-276.1.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 305.

§ 16.1-276.2.
Transportation orders in certain proceedings.

In any proceeding (i) pursuant to subdivisions 2, 4 or 5 of subsection A of §

16.1-241

, (ii) pursuant to subsections K or U of §

16.1-241

, (iii) involving a child who is alleged to be abused or neglected, or (iv) involving a child who is before the court pursuant to §§

16.1-281

,

16.1-282

or §

16.1-282.1

, if the judge finds that the presence at a hearing of a prisoner in a state, local or regional correctional institution is essential to the just adjudication and disposition of the proceeding, the judge may issue an order to the Director of the Department of Corrections or the administrator of the state, local or regional correctional institution to deliver such witness to the sheriff of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the order. Such orders shall be executed in accordance with §

8.01-410

. Any such orders shall issue only upon consideration of the importance of the personal appearance of the person.

The party seeking the testimony of such prisoner shall advance a sum sufficient to defray the expenses and compensation of the officers, which the court shall tax as costs. When the party seeking the attendance of the prisoner is an agency of the Commonwealth or when the attendance is sought on motion of the court, no sum shall be advanced to defray the expenses or compensation of the correctional officers and sheriff nor shall any such sum be taxed as costs.

History.

2001, c. 513.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-276.3.
Use of telephonic communication systems or electronic video and audio communication systems to conduct hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any civil proceeding under this chapter in which a party or witness is incarcerated or when otherwise authorized by the court, the court may, in its discretion, conduct any hearing using a telephonic communication system or an electronic audio and video communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any electronic audio and video communication system used to conduct such a hearing shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

2001, c. 513.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-277.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 889.